Wyoming, session 2026, HB0094.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) Public confidence in election outcomes
depends on processes that are transparent, verifiable, pure
and secure;

(ii) The use of electronic tabulation and
electronic voting systems has created concerns in the
public regarding election oversight, transparency, security
and cost;

(iii) Manual tabulation and counting of paper
ballots under uniform statewide standards will increase
election accuracy, transparency and voter trust;

(iv) Wyoming elections should rely on processes
that can be observed, audited, and replicated by citizens;

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(v) It is necessary to repeal statutory
authorizations for electronic tabulation and e-pollbooks
and to establish statewide standards for manual tabulation
and counting that maintain flexibility for improved
counting methods over time.

(b) The purpose of this act is to transition all
Wyoming elections to paper ballots that are manually
counted in public view under uniform statewide standards
ensuring purity of the vote, transparency, security,
accuracy, accessibility and public confidence.

Section 2. W.S. 22-6-201 through 22-6-210 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 2
MANUAL BALLOT COUNTING AND AUDITING

22-6-201. Paper ballots and design standards.

(a) All votes shall be cast on paper ballots that
are:
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

(i) Able to be read by a human;

(ii) Able to be manually tallied or hand
countable;

(iii) Designed in accordance with the
requirements of this Election Code and with statewide
standards established by rule of the secretary of state in
accordance with this Election Code. The secretary of state
shall use the USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections" white
paper guidelines to adopt rules under this paragraph.

(b) Ballots shall contain only text and marks that
can be interpreted by human inspection without the aid of
electronic tabulation devices.

(c) Ballots shall include security features
sufficient to prevent unauthorized duplication or
substitution of ballots as specified by rule of the
secretary of state.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

(d) Accessible voting devices permitted under federal
law to comply with the Help America Vote Act of 2002, P.L.
107-252, shall be used only to produce one (1) ballot per
voter that shall be able to be read by a human and that
shall be manually counted in the same manner as all other
ballots.

22-6-202. Ballot security, custody, transport and
storage.

(a) The secretary of state shall adopt uniform
statewide standards for the secure production, transport,
storage and accounting of ballots that are consistent with
the provisions of this article.

(b) Each county clerk shall maintain a documented
chain of custody for all ballots and election materials
from printing or receipt of the ballots through final
storage of the ballots after the election.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(c) Every transfer of custody of ballots and election
materials shall be recorded with the date, time, persons
involved and the seal or container number, if applicable.

(d) All ballots and election materials shall be
stored in sealed containers under continuous video
surveillance for not less than twenty-four (24) months
after the election.

(e) All records and recordings described in this
section are public records, subject to reasonable
protection of:

(i) Personal voter information as required by
law;

(ii) Ballot security details as determined by
rule of the secretary of state as necessary to ensure the
security of elections.

22-6-203. Publicly conducted manual counting of
ballots.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(a) Manual counting of ballots shall be conducted in
public view at the designated counting centers for each
county or precinct.

(b) Observers from political parties, candidates and
the public shall be permitted to observe the manual
counting of ballots under conditions established by rule of
the secretary of state that allow meaningful observation of
the counting process without interference.

(c) Areas where counting is occurring shall be
recorded with video and audio equipment, and recordings of
the counting shall be retained by the county clerk for not
less than sixty (60) months. Recordings under this
subsection shall be made publicly available on the website
of the county clerk.

(d) Before counting begins under this section,
election judges shall verify publicly that all containers
are sealed, shall note the seal numbers and shall document
the total number of ballots received by ballot category as
provided in W.S. 22-6-204(b)(v).

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(e) Counting shall begin as soon as practicable after
the closing of the polls and shall continue without undue
delay until all ballots are fully tallied, counted,
reconciled and reported.

(f) Count totals by precinct and ballot type shall be
made public not later than one (1) hour after the
completion of counting under this section.

22-6-204. Statewide standards for manual counting of
ballots.

(a) All ballots shall be counted by hand using a
nationally recognized hand counting methodology and in
accordance with uniform statewide counting standards
adopted by the secretary of state. The secretary of state
shall use the USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections" white
paper guidelines to adopt rules under this subsection.

(b) The uniform statewide counting standards adopted
by the secretary of state shall include at minimum:

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(i) Ballot security features to prevent the use
of fraudulent printers and duplication systems;

(ii) Counting teams, including not less than
four (4) members of not less than two (2) different
political affiliations, with balanced representation of
political parties to the extent practicable;

(iii) Oaths of impartiality administered to all
counting personnel;

(iv) Standardized training in ballot handling,
determining voter intent, dispute resolution, tally
recording, reconciliation and custody documentation;

(v) Requiring ballots to be separated and
counted in three (3) categories:

(A) Absentee voting;

(B) Early voting;

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(C) In-person voting on the day of
election.

(vi) Independent tallies by not less than two
(2) recorders per team, reconciled and signed before
finalizing the vote count;

(vii) Batch processing procedures allowing
verification and identification of discrepancies;

(viii) Reconciliation of ballots at each
transfer of ballots, including matching totals of issued,
cast, spoiled, provisional and unused ballots;

(ix) Documentation linking all tally sheets,
reconciliation forms and chain-of-custody records;

(x) Requiring all documentation to be duplicated
and available to be held as copies by head judges;

(xi) Requiring uniform incident logging for
errors, corrections and disputes;

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(xii) Prohibiting the use of any apparatus that
automatically examines and counts votes recorded on paper
ballots or ballot cards and tabulates the results. Nothing
in this paragraph shall prohibit the use of simple
calculators that are used solely for arithmetic operations
to sum manually counted tallies.

(c) Each county shall use a manual counting method
that is consistent with the uniform statewide counting
standards under this section and that is approved by the
secretary of state.

22-6-205. Counting for absentee voting, early voting
and provisional ballots.

(a) Ballots from absentee voting and early voting
shall be separately verified, stored by precinct and
counted under the same security and manual counting
standards as ballots from in-person voting on the day of
election.

(b) The outer envelope for each absentee ballot shall
be logged upon receipt with a unique identifier, date and
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
time and voter record linkage. Poll books shall be updated
to reflect the receipt of the absentee ballot.

(c) Signatures and voter eligibility shall be
verified before separation of the ballot from identifying
information.

(d) Ballots failing verification shall be documented,
segregated and excluded from counting pending review by
election judges.

(e) Verified ballots shall be manually counted and
included in precinct-level results.

(f) Provisional ballots shall be stored separately
and shall be manually counted after eligibility is
confirmed.

22-6-206. Timelines for counting; reporting of
results.

(a) Manual counting shall begin as soon as
practicable after the close of polls and shall continue
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
without undue delay until all ballots are fully tallied,
counted, reconciled and reported.

(b) The secretary of state may authorize by rule an
early start of counting for ballots cast and secured prior
to election day, subject to secrecy and custody
restrictions. The secretary of state shall use the
USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections" white paper guidelines
to adopt rules under this subsection.

(c) Each county clerk shall report verified precinct
results to the secretary of state as soon as practicable
after counting is complete. The secretary of state may
establish counting and reporting timelines by rule that are
consistent with the requirements of this article.

(d) Counties shall complete counting within the time
limits established under subsection (c) of this section,
except in extraordinary circumstances documented in the
public record.

22-6-207. Rulemaking; training.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(a) The secretary of state shall adopt rules
necessary to implement this article, including establishing
uniform statewide standards for ballot design, chain of
custody, manual counting, reconciliation, training and
public observation. The secretary of state shall use the
USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections" white paper guidelines
to adopt rules under this subsection.

(b) The secretary of state shall establish a
standardized curriculum for county clerks to train election
officials, judges and counting teams.

(c) Training sessions conducted under this section
shall be open to the public for observation. No person
shall conduct counting activities under this article unless
the person has completed the training required under this
section.

22-6-208. Meetings and notice requirements.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this
section, any meeting of the county clerk or the secretary
of state concerning the counting, auditing, canvassing or
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
recounting of ballots shall be publicly noticed not less
than seven (7) calendar days before the meeting.

(b) Notice under subsection (a) of this section for a
meeting of the county clerk shall be posted on the county
website, at the county clerk's office and shall be
published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county.

(c) For county matters, the county clerk shall
provide notice of the meeting to the chairmen of all major
political parties within the county.

(d) For state matters, the secretary of state shall
provide notice of the meeting to the state chairmen of all
major political parties recognized in Wyoming.

(e) Emergency meetings may be held only to address
urgent issues and shall be publicly noticed as soon as
practicable with a statement of the emergency that required
the emergency meeting.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(f) All meetings under this section shall be open to
the public. Any minutes or recordings of a meeting under
this section shall be made available to the public not
later than seventy-two (72) hours after the adjournment of
the meeting.

22-6-209. Recounts.

(a) Any recount required by law shall be performed
manually in accordance with the same standards and
procedures as the initial count.

(b) Recounts shall be conducted publicly, recorded on
video and audio as provided by W.S. 22-6-203(c) and the
recordings shall be retained for not less than eight (8)
years.

22-6-210. Prohibited practices and penalties.

(a) No person shall use electronic voting equipment
including, but not limited to, tabulators, automated
counting equipment, e-pollbooks or scanners in any election
conducted under this article. Nothing in this subsection
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
shall prohibit the use of simple calculators that are used
solely for arithmetic operations to sum manually counted
tallies.

(b) Any election official or county clerk who
knowingly violates this article or rules adopted under this
article shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per violation.
Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit prosecution for
any violation of chapter 26 of this title resulting from a
violation of this article.

(c) The attorney general or any county attorney may
enforce this section through civil or criminal proceedings.

Section 3. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xi), (xxii), (xxxii),
(xxxiv)(B), (xlii), (xlix) and by creating new paragraphs
(lvii) through (lxx), 22-2-121(b) and (g), 22-3-113(a),
22-3-117(a)(i) and (ii), 22-5-202, 22-6-115,
22-6-119(a)(iii), 22-6-121(a), 22-6-122, 22-6-130,
22-8-108(b) and (c), 22-8-113, 22-8-115(a), 22-9-109(a),
22-9-121(c)(i), 22-12-103, 22-12-107(a)(x), 22-12-115,
22-13-103(b), 22-13-110, 22-14-102, 22-14-107,
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
22-14-113(b), 22-14-114(a), 22-15-105(a), 22-15-109(b),
22-16-103(c)(iv), 22-16-109(a), 22-16-122(a)(intro) and
(c), 22-21-109, 22-22-203(b), 22-22-302, 22-26-103,
22-26-105, 22-26-106(a) by creating a new paragraph (v),
22-26-112(a) by creating a new paragraph (xi),
22-26-113(a)(intro), 22-26-114, 22-26-119 and
22-29-114(e)(intro) are amended to read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xi) "Counting center" or "hand counting center"
is the location or locations designated precinct
established by the county clerk for the automatic
tabulating and manual counting and tallying of ballots;

(xxii) "Pollbook" means a paper book, or
hardware, software or any combination thereof commonly
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
referred to as an electronic pollbook, used in a polling
place on election day containing information specified by
law;

(xxxii) "Tally sheet" means the document used to
tabulate hand counted paper ballots official form used by
counting teams and tally judges to record vote totals for
each candidate and ballot measure and that are required to
be signed by all team members participating in the manual
count;

(xxxiv) "Voting device" means:

(B) A device for marking the ballots with
ink or another substance; or

(xlii) "Recount" or "manual recount" is the
processing of ballots through the tabulation system for an
additional time or times, conducted for the specific
purpose of counting votes again in any specific race, based
upon the criteria of W.S. 22-16-109 or 22-16-111 second or
subsequent count of ballots performed by hand to verify
results or resolve discrepancies as required by law;
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

(xlix) "Vote center" means a polling place at
which any registered elector in the political subdivision
holding the election may vote, regardless of the precinct
in which he resides;, connected through secure internet
connections to provide voting information to and receive
voting information from the electronic pollbook maintained
by the county clerk and used as an option to traditional
polling places at the discretion of the county clerk;

(lvii) "Ballot reconciliation" means the process
of comparing the total number of ballots that are issued,
cast, spoiled, voted as provisional ballots and that are
unused ballots to verify that the totals match the number
of ballots originally received by a precinct or counting
center;

(lviii) "Chain of custody" means the continuous
documentation of the possession, transfer and storage of
ballots and related election materials from printing
through final archival storage;

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(lix) "Counting team" means a group of trained
election workers assigned to manually count ballots in
public view;

(lx) "Early voting" means absentee voting before
election day where an elector requests a ballot in person
from the county clerk, completes the ballot on site and
returns the ballot to the clerk by hand;

(lxi) "Election judge" means a person appointed
and sworn under Wyoming law to oversee and manage the
conduct of elections, including counting, custody and
reconciliation of ballots and certification of results;

(lxii) "Election worker" means a paid or unpaid
volunteer assisting with duties necessary to conduct an
election, including ballot handling and manual counting of
ballots;

(lxiii) "Hand counting" or "manual counting"
means the process of reading and tallying votes on paper
ballots by human inspection;

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(lxiv) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot cast
by a voter whose eligibility to vote has not been verified;

(lxv) "Public observation" means members of the
public, poll watchers and representatives of political
parties authorized to be present and observe counting and
reconciliation activities without interfering with the
conduct of the election;

(lxvi) "Reconciliation record" means the written
document that shows the verification of ballot totals at
each stage of the election process, including the total
number of ballots procured, issued, collected and counted;

(lxvii) "Tally judge" means an election judge
responsible for verifying and recording vote totals from
counting teams, reconciling independent tallies and
certifying precinct results for transmittal to the county
clerk;

(lxviii) "USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections"
white paper guidelines" means the USCase.org "Gold Standard
Elections" white paper guidelines as revised on April 11,
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
2025 or thereafter and published on the website of the
United States council on accurate and secure elections;

(lxix) "Voter ballot security," "voter ballot
secrecy," "vote security" or "vote secrecy" means that the
ballot is kept secret for the period beginning the moment
the voter picks up a ballot through the moment the voter
puts the ballot in the ballot box. "Voter secrecy" shall
not include any requirement to keep a ballot secret after
the ballot is deposited in the ballot box or any
requirement to protect the handwriting of the voter;

(lxx) "Voter intent standard" means criteria
established by rule of the secretary of state to use the
USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections" white paper guidelines
to determine a voter's intended choice on a ballot when
markings are unclear or incomplete and that is required to
be applied uniformly across all counties.

22-2-121. Chief election officer to prepare forms;
rules; advice.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(b) The secretary of state shall promulgate such
rules as are necessary to maintain uniform manual voting
and vote manual counting procedures and to provide for
orderly voting. The secretary of state shall use the
USCase.org "Gold Standard Elections" white paper guidelines
to adopt rules under this subsection.

(g) The secretary of state shall adopt rules and
regulations that allow for the counting of ballots at a
central counting center. The rules shall specify procedures
for delivering ballots to the central counting center
manual counting of ballots at a hand counting center. The
secretary of state shall use the USCase.org "Gold Standard
Elections" white paper guidelines to adopt rules under this
subsection.

22-3-113. Disposition of pollbooks after polls close.

(a) After the polls are closed, judges of the
election shall make confirm that the printed pollbooks
agree and shall return one (1) pollbook to the county
clerk.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
22-3-117. Absentee registration generally; use of
federal postcard.

(a) Notwithstanding any other section or provision in
this chapter, any citizen of the United States who is a
resident of Wyoming may apply for registration by providing
the information required by W.S. 22-3-103(a), acceptable
identification, proof of United States citizenship and
proof of residence and by completing and subscribing the
form of voter registration oath prescribed by W.S.
22-3-103(b) before any person authorized by law to
administer oaths. Each county clerk shall furnish the voter
registration oath forms. The applicant shall mail or
return the completed voter registration oath form to the
county clerk in the county in which the applicant resides.
In order to vote in the next election, the application must
be received in the county clerk's office before the close
of registration for that election, or:

(i) Be received by mail or email and processed
by the county clerk during the closed period described in
W.S. 22-3-102(a) if it is accompanied by an absentee ballot
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
request for elections where a voter may register at the
polls; or

(ii) Be made at the county clerk's office during
the closed period described in W.S. 22-3-102(a) if the
voter simultaneously votes at the county clerk's office; or

22-5-202. Major political party participation;
separate ballots; same time.

Major political parties shall participate in the primary
election and each shall have a separate party ballot. The
primary election of major political parties shall be held
at the same time and at the same polling places and shall
be conducted by the same election officials. The results of
the primary election shall be counted manually in
accordance with the procedures specified in this Election
Code.

22-6-115. Specifications for paper ballots.

Official paper ballots shall be uniform in size, printed in
black ink on good quality paper through which printing
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
cannot be read. Ballots shall be white, except as otherwise
provided. On a voting machine each column or row containing
the titles of offices and candidates for office shall be
arranged shall be formatted to indicate clearly the office
for which a candidate is running and shall be suitable for
manual counting in accordance with W.S. 22-6-201.

22-6-119. Format of primary ballot.

(a) The primary ballot of each major political party
shall be printed in substantial compliance with this
format:

(iii) On the second line shall be printed the
following instructions: "To vote for a person whose name is
printed on the ballot, mark the square immediately adjacent
to the name of the person for whom you desire to vote. To
vote for a person whose name is not printed on the ballot,
write the person's name in the blank space provided for
that purpose and mark the square immediately adjacent to
the name of the person. Ballots will be manually counted.";

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
22-6-121. Political party ballot position on general
election ballot; order of candidates' names.

(a) Political party position shall be determined on
the general election ballot according to the number of
votes received by each party within the county for the
office of representative in congress at the last preceding
general election. The party receiving the highest number
of votes shall appear first following the names of the
offices to be voted for and other parties shall follow in
the order of their respective numbers of such votes. The
order of any provisional parties will be drawn by the
secretary of state. Any independent candidates shall
appear following the last party and shall be listed in
alphabetical order, subject to rotation. When more than
one (1) candidate is to be elected to a particular office,
the names of candidates shall be printed in alphabetical
order, subject to rotation, on all ballots. for electronic
and machine voting systems as defined by W.S. 22-1-102.

22-6-122. Rotation of candidates' names.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
The names of candidates for each office shall be rotated on
all ballots by precinct for all elections. In each county
the name of each candidate shall appear substantially an
equal number of times at the top, at the bottom, and in
each intermediate place. In a voting machine polling place,
If candidates for the same office occupy more than one (1)
line on the voting machine ballot, the number of names
appearing on each line shall be as nearly equal as
possible.

22-6-130. Post-election ballot audit; ballot
reconciliation.

(a) Each county clerk shall complete an audit of the
county's unofficial election results by identifying and
reviewing the smallest observable percentage not less than
ten percent (10%) of the cast ballots in each contest in
the county between the statewide candidates who received
the most votes and the statewide candidates who received
the second highest votes. for each contest within the
county not later than the first Thursday following a
primary, special or general election. Additional contests
may be added to the audit at the discretion of the county
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
clerk. Using a formula developed by the University of
Wyoming, each county clerk shall use the smallest
observable percentage to determine a statistically
significant sample size of the ballots to be audited under
this section. To ensure the timely completion of this
procedure under this subsection, the number of ballots
audited shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total
number of ballots cast.

(b) Each county clerk shall conduct an audit of the
election using the statistically significant ballot sample
size and the corresponding ballots for the contests
selected for audit determined under subsection (a) of this
section. Each county clerk shall provide the audit results
to the secretary of state not later than one (1) day before
the meeting of the state canvassing board as provided in
W.S. 22-16-118 ensure that the total number of ballots is
reconciled at each stage of the election process.
Reconciliation includes determining:

(i) The starting number of ballots procured or
printed in preparation for an election;

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(ii) The starting number of ballots issued to
each polling location;

(iii) The total number of ballots printed on
demand, including any ballot produced by an accessible
voting device permitted under federal law to comply with
the Help America Vote Act of 2002, P.L. 107-252;

(iv) The number of ballots distributed by mail
or in-person, categorized by whether the ballot was
distributed for absentee voting, early voting or in-person
voting on the day of the election;

(v) The number of ballots cast by any method;

(vi) The number of spoiled ballots;

(vii) The number of ballots remaining at the
close of polls that were not issued or case; and

(viii) The number of provisional ballots.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(c) The total number of ballots accounted for under
subsection (b) of this section shall equal the initial
total of blank ballots provided, plus any ballot printed on
demand as provided by paragraph (b)(iii) of this section.
Reconciliation shall be conducted by hand and documented,
ensuring no discrepancies exist before proceeding to the
audit under subsection (a) of this section.

(d) If there is discrepancy in counting under
subsection (a) of this section or in reconciliation under
subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the secretary of
state shall be immediately notified and an investigation
shall be initiated by the county canvassing board to
identify the cause of the discrepancy. If the reason for
the discrepancy cannot be determined beyond a reasonable
doubt the county canvassing board shall declare any
affected part of the election results to be null and void
and the provisions of W.S. 22-16-122 shall apply to the
election.

(e) For purposes of this section, the audit under
subsection (a) of this section shall include recording and
verifying the votes cast for each race appearing on a
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
ballot. Reconciliation under subsections (b) and (c) of
this section means reconciling and confirming the total
number of ballots issued compared to the number of ballots
that were not issued, the number of ballots that were cast,
the number of ballots that were spoiled and the number of
provisional ballots.

(f) Each county clerk shall provide the audit results
under subsection (a) of this section and the full and
completed reconciliation of ballot totals under subsections
(b) and (c) of this section to the secretary of state not
later than three (3) days before the meeting of the state
canvassing board as provided in W.S. 22-16-118. Audit
results and reconciliation reports filed with the secretary
of state under this subsection shall be made publicly
available on the website of the secretary of state.

22-8-108. Appointment, composition and authority of
counting boards; when judges to count.

(b) A counting board shall be appointed for each
designated counting center in each county. using an
electronic voting system. The board shall consist of at
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
least seven (7) members who shall be the county clerk or
his designated deputy, and three (3) members of each major
political party appointed by the county clerk central
committee of each party. Additional members may be
appointed by the county clerk central committee of each
party if deemed necessary by the county clerk but equal
major party membership shall be assured. No more than one
(1) person under the age of eighteen (18) may be appointed
as to each counting board. All ballots shall be counted
manually by the counting board.

(c) The counting board in a paper ballot polling
place has no authority to act until polls are declared
closed as provided in W.S. 22-13-117, except as provided in
W.S. 22-9-125(d). A counting board in an electronic voting
system counting center may commence preparing absentee
ballots for counting at any time on election day, or before
election day as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d) 22-6-206(b).

22-8-113. Training schools; generally and payment for
attending.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
Not later than four (4) days before the primary and general
election, the county clerk under the direction of the
secretary of state shall conduct a training school for
judges of election and members of counting boards to
provide instruction in the performance of their duties.
The training school, which is also open to the public,
shall be held at the times and places announced by the
county clerk, and the secretary of state shall prescribe
the minimum curriculum for the school including manual hand
counting procedures as provided in W.S. 22-6-207.
Additional schools may be held at the discretion of the
county clerk. Unless training is otherwise provided to the
satisfaction of the county clerk, All judges of election
and members of counting boards are obligated to attend at
least one (1) such school. All judges and members of the
counting board, unless the judge or member is volunteering,
shall be paid not less than ten dollars ($10.00) as
determined by the board of county commissioners for
attending a school.

22-8-115. Oath for election officials.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(a) An election official shall subscribe to this oath
in writing before entering upon his duties at each
election:

"I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will impartially
and to the best of my knowledge and ability perform the
election duties of my office or role. I will studiously
endeavor to prevent all frauds, deceit and abuse in the
application of the election laws of this state."

22-9-109. Form of absentee ballot.

(a) The absentee ballot shall be in the same form
prescribed by law for the official ballot. or a reasonable
printed reproduction of the prescribed form for electronic
ballots.

22-9-121. Examination of absentee ballot affidavit;
rejection; voting ballots.

(c) If it is sufficient:

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(i) In a paper ballot each precinct, the name of
the absent elector shall be entered in the pollbook, the
inner ballot envelope shall be opened by a judge of
election and the ballots therein shall be removed. The
ballot shall then be placed in the regular ballot box by a
judge of election and manually counted in the same manner
as other ballots;

22-12-103. Furnishing of booths.

The county clerk in all elections shall furnish each
polling place with sufficient booths, paper ballots or
voting machines and supplies to permit convenient and
secret marking of ballots.

22-12-107. Materials for judges.

(a) Before election day the county clerk shall cause
to be delivered to one (1) of the judges of election in
each polling place the following materials:

(x) Materials necessary for hand counting
ballots and other necessary supplies.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

22-12-115. Examination of ballot box.

Not earlier than twenty-four (24) hours before the polls
are open, the judges of election shall open and examine the
ballot box to determine that it is empty and relock it with
a tamper resistant device before the polls are open. The
ballot box shall not again be opened until the polls are
closed., except when necessitated by operation of the
voting equipment at the direction of the county clerk and
only in the presence of two (2) or more election judges
with different political party affiliations. It shall not
be removed from the presence of the judges of election or
counting board until all ballots are counted and recorded
as required by law and in the presence of two (2) or more
election judges with different political party affiliation.

22-13-103. Preservation of order; privacy of voting
booths.

(b) To protect the privacy of the voter, voting
booths and voting machines shall be kept clear of all
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
persons except voters marking ballots and election
officials discharging their duties.

22-13-110. Entering write-in votes.

Write-in votes may be entered on a voting machine on the
ballot in the manner indicated by instructions posted on
the voting booth or indicated on the voting machine
provided on the ballot.

22-14-102. Who may be present after all votes are
cast and polls close; making pollbooks agree; counting
votes.

After all the votes are cast and the polls are officially
declared closed, only election judges and authorized
observers as provided in W.S. 22-15-109 shall be permitted
in a polling place. When all ballots are cast, the machine
shall be locked against further voting and sealed as
prescribed by law. Except as otherwise provided by W.S.
22-14-114(b), election judges shall commence to count votes
and shall continue without adjournment until counting is
completed Election judges shall ensure reconciliation of
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
all ballots as provided in W.S. 22-6-130(b) and (c) and
shall then secure all ballots within locked boxes secured
with tamper proof devices for transfer to the precinct
polling center. Hand counting of ballots shall commence
immediately upon arrival at the counting center as provided
in W.S. 22-6-201 through 22-6-210.

22-14-107. Tabulation of count.

The unofficial tabulation indicating the vote by precinct,
based on hand count results, shall immediately be
transmitted by the county clerk to the secretary of state.
These unofficial tabulations shall be tabulated by the
secretary of the state. The secretary of state shall
provide procedures for such transmittal through rule and
regulation.

22-14-113. Return of voting supplies.

(b) All voting supplies, ballot boxes, and voting
machines hand counting materials and hand tallying
materials shall be returned to the county clerk as soon as
possible after the vote has been returned.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

22-14-114. Counting of ballots.

(a) For ballots designed to be counted by machine,
each individual vote shall be determined by the voting
equipment and shall not be determined subjectively by human
tabulation except when the intent of the voter is
unmistakable but the ballot was received in such damaged,
soiled, or other condition that it is rejected by the
machine. The secretary of state may promulgate rules
establishing standards for counting such ballots. For
ballots not designed to be counted by machine, Only votes
clearly marked, as provided by W.S. 22-14-104 and rules
promulgated pursuant to this code, shall be tallied. For
write-in votes, names which are misspelled or abbreviated
or the use of nicknames of candidates shall be counted for
the candidate if the vote is obvious to the board counting
team.

22-15-105. Challenged person may vote; generally.

(a) If a person offering to vote is challenged, and
the challenge is not resolved in accordance with W.S.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
22-15-106, an election judge shall offer the voter a ballot
clearly marked "provisional" and which cannot be
automatically tabulated shall be securely stored separately
from other ballots. Provisional ballots shall be counted
separately from other ballots after the voter has been
verified by election officials.

22-15-109. Poll watchers; certification;
qualification; authority; removal.

(b) A poll watcher shall belong to the political
party he represents and shall be a registered elector
residing in the county. A poll watcher shall serve only at
the polling place designated on the certificate. A poll
watcher is authorized to observe voter turn out, and
registration and hand counting procedures and may make
written memoranda but shall not challenge voters, conduct
electioneering activities, interfere with ballot counting
or disrupt the polling process.

22-16-103. County canvass procedures.

(c) The county canvassing board shall:
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

(iv) Count and tabulate Hand count and tally the
votes on the provisional ballots which were determined to
have been cast by qualified electors;

22-16-109. Recounts.

(a) The county canvassing board shall make a perform
a manual recount of precinct votes if it appears to the
board that a recount is required due to irregularities in
that precinct. The recount shall be conducted using the
hand counting procedures provided in W.S. 22-6-201 through
22-6-210.

22-16-122. Election declared null and void; special
election.

(a) If a canvassing board is unable to determine
which candidate has been elected or nominated, the
canvassing board shall declare any part of the election
results to be null and void as to that office and the
county clerk shall call a special election to make a
decision. For purposes of this section, a canvassing board
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
shall be unable to determine which candidate is nominated
or elected if there is a discrepancy reported under W.S.
22-6-130(d) and the discrepancy resulted in a material
error in the election or if:

(c) If only certain precincts are allowed to vote in
the special election, the votes received in the special
election shall be hand counted and added to the unofficial
results not declared null and void for that office from the
initial primary, general election or other special
election.

22-21-109. Supplies; regulations; costs.

The county clerk may utilize voting machines or electronic
voting systems shall use paper ballots that are counted by
hand at any bond election and may prescribe the form of the
ballot, the duties of election officials, and other
reasonable regulations pertaining thereto. The political
subdivision holding the bond election shall pay the actual
costs of the election or an equitably proportioned share of
a concurrent election, as determined by the county clerk.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
22-22-203. Determining validity of application;
placement on ballot; procedure for multi-county districts.

(b) Each county clerk in each election involving a
school or community college district which crosses county
boundaries shall determine whether voting machines,
electronic voting system, paper ballots, or a combination
thereof, shall be used to insure use paper ballots that are
counted by hand to ensure that each qualified elector votes
only for the candidate or candidates from the school
district and trustee residence area, if any, and from the
community college district and subdistrict, if any, for
which he is entitled to vote.

22-22-302. Conduct of elections.

Unless specifically otherwise provided, a school or
community college district election shall be governed by
the laws regulating statewide elections and in
even-numbered years be conducted and canvassed by the same
election officials, using the same poll lists, using paper
ballots that are counted by hand and at the same times and
polling places, as county elections.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

22-26-103. Unlawful opening of ballot box; tampering
with ballot counting materials.

Unlawful opening of a ballot box or tampering with ballot
counting materials consists of opening, inspecting,
removing or altering the contents of a ballot box or
inspecting or removing the contents thereof tampering with
hand count records or tally sheets without lawful
authority, or conspiring with others so to open a ballot
box to violate the provisions of this section.

22-26-105. Unlawful possession of key.

Unlawful possession of a key consists of the possession at
any time of a key to a voting machine or ballot box, or
making a duplicate thereof, or tampering with a physical
lock on a box that is securing ballots, unless authorized
by law.

22-26-106. False voting.

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
(a) False voting consists of performing any of the
following acts in connection with or related to the
election process or an election:

(v) Changing voting results including by
inserting unlawful ballots in a ballot box or by tampering
with hand count records, hand count tally sheets, vote
reconciliation forms or other official election logs.

22-26-112. Misdemeanor offenses generally.

(a) Unless a different penalty is specifically
provided in this code, the following acts, if knowingly and
willfully committed, are misdemeanor offenses punishable by
not more than six (6) months in a county jail or a fine of
not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both:

(xi) Interfering with the hand counting of
ballots or with the reconciliation of ballots and tally
sheets.

22-26-113. Electioneering too close to a polling
place.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

(a) Electioneering too close to a polling place or
absentee polling place under W.S. 22-9-125 when voting is
being conducted, consists of any form of campaigning,
including the display of campaign signs or distribution of
campaign literature, the soliciting of signatures to any
petition or the canvassing or polling of voters, except
exit polling by news media, within one hundred (100) yards
on the day of a primary, general or special election and
within one hundred (100) feet on all other days, of any
public entrance to the building in which the polling place
is located. This section shall not apply to bumper stickers
affixed to a vehicle while parked within or passing through
the distance specified in this subsection, provided that:

22-26-114. Disturbing polling place.

Disturbing a polling place consists of creating any
disorder or disruption at a polling place on election day,
or absentee polling place under W.S. 22-9-125, or
interfering with the orderly conduct of an election.

22-26-119. Violation of Election Code by officials.
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341

Violation of the Election Code by an official consists of
the willful violation of the Election Code by any official
or by any deputy or assistant official, or the willful
failure or refusal of any official or assistant to perform
an act or duty required of him by the Election Code,
including the failure to track ballot totals at any time
starting at the beginning of the election, failure to
ensure compliance with hand count procedures, tampering
with hand count tally sheets or neglecting any duty for
hand counting as prescribed by law. Any official, deputy or
assistant who commits a violation of the Election Code is
guilty of a felony and, in addition to the penalty
prescribed by W.S. 22-26-101, is subject to removal from
office in a proceeding instituted for that purpose.

22-29-114. Election procedures for elections other
than mail ballot elections; canvass, recount and contests.

(e) Any special district election conducted by the
county clerk shall be canvassed by the county canvassing
board or a canvassing board appointed by the county clerk,
consisting of two (2) electors and the county clerk. If
HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
more than one (1) county is involved, the election shall be
canvassed in accordance with chapter 16 of the Wyoming
Election Code of 1973, as amended, by a canvassing board
drawn from the membership of the appropriate county
canvassing boards appointed by the appropriate county
commissioners. The commissioners shall notify the county
clerks of the canvassing board appointments. Any special
district election not conducted by a county clerk shall be
canvassed by a special district canvassing board. The
special district canvassing board shall consist of the
district secretary and two (2) electors appointed by the
district board. Any canvass shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 16 of the Wyoming Election Code of
1973, as amended. The canvass shall be conducted within
seven (7) business days of the election and shall include a
manual review of all hand counted ballots to ensure
accuracy. The canvassing board shall have the authority to
call for a special election in accordance with W.S.
22-16-122 if any discrepancies in the hand count are
identified and cannot be resolved beyond a reasonable
doubt. The canvassing board shall:

HB0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0341
Section 4. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(i), (iii), (xiv),
(xxxiv)(C), (xliii) and (liv), 22-3-113(b),
22-3-117(a)(iii), 22-6-113, 22-8-107, 22-9-121(c)(ii),
22-9-125, 22-10-101 through 22-10-111, 22-11-101.1,
22-11-102 through 22-11-109, 22-12-107(a)(v), 22-12-110,
22-12-112 through 22-12-114, 22-13-109, 22-13-112,
22-14-105, 22-14-110, 22-14-111(a)(i), 22-14-113(a),
22-26-101(a)(iii) and (xi) and 22-26-104 are repealed.

Section 5. This act shall apply to all elections in
Wyoming after January 1, 2026.

Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0094